Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.855

Faculty tenure—Written agreement embodying terms of employment furnished faculty.

The appointing authority shall provide each faculty member, immediately upon employment, with a written agreement which delineates the terms of employment including all conditions and responsibilities attached thereto.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 35. Formerly RCW 28.85.855.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.